California statutes. Education Code
(h) The governing board of each school district shall make reasonable efforts to provide limited-English-proficient pupils in need of English language development instruction with teachers who hold appropriate credentials, language development specialist certificates, or cross-cultural language and academic development certificates that authorize English language development instruction. However, a teacher awarded a certificate or certificates of completion pursuant to this section shall be deemed certificated and competent to provide the services listed on that
 certificate of completion.

(i) A teacher completing staff development pursuant to this section shall be credited with three semester units or four quarter units for each block of 45 clock hours completed for the purpose of meeting the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 44253.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 8.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44254.

(a) The commission shall establish standards for a restricted reading certificate to enable holders of a teaching credential to provide the early development of reading and language arts skills and the early correction of a pupil’s reading difficulties.

(b) (1) The standards and qualifications for the restricted reading certificate shall include demonstrated knowledge of both of the following:

(A) Current and confirmed research in teaching basic reading skills that train the candidate for the restricted reading certificate in ongoing, diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(B) Teaching techniques for basic reading skills that include direct instruction in phonemic awareness, systematic, explicit phonics, and comprehension skills.

(2) The candidate shall also demonstrate knowledge of early intervention techniques, and shall receive guided practice with all of the aforementioned skills within a clinical setting. For the purposes of this section, “direct, systematic, explicit phonics” means spelling patterns, direct instruction in the relationships among sounds and symbols, and practice in connected, decodable text.

(c) The commission shall be authorized to issue a restricted reading certificate to holders of a teaching credential who meet the commission’s standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1067, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.   See similar Section 44254 (added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1068), as amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

44254.

(a) The commission shall establish standards for a restricted reading certificate to enable holders of a teaching credential to provide the early and continuing development of reading and language arts skills and the earliest possible correction of a pupil’s reading difficulties.

(b) The standards and qualifications for the restricted reading certificate shall include, but not be limited to, demonstrated knowledge of the following:

(1) Current and confirmed research in the teaching of basic reading skills, including research in ongoing, diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(2) Techniques for teaching basic reading skills that include direct instruction in phonemic awareness, direct systematic, explicit phonics, and comprehension skills.

(3) Early intervention techniques.

(c) A candidate for a restricted reading certificate shall receive, within a clinical setting, guided practice in all of the skills described in subdivision (b).

(d) The commission may issue a restricted reading certificate to a holder of a teaching credential who meets the commission’s standards.

(e) For purposes of this section, “direct systematic, explicit phonics” means spelling patterns, the direct instruction of sound and symbol relationships, and practice in reading connected, decodable text.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1068) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44256.

Authorization for teaching credentials shall be of four basic kinds, as defined below:

(a) (1) “Single subject instruction” means the practice of assignment of teachers and students to specified subject matter courses, as is commonly practiced in California high schools and most California junior high schools. The holder of a single subject teaching credential or a standard secondary credential or a special secondary teaching credential, as defined in this subdivision, who either (A) has completed 20 semester hours of coursework or 10 semester hours of upper division or graduate coursework approved by the commission at a regionally accredited institution of higher education in any subject commonly taught in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, or (B) has been verified as
 having subject matter competence pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 for any subject commonly taught in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall be eligible to have this subject appear on the credential as an authorization to teach this subject. The commission, by regulation, may require that evidence of additional competence is a condition for instruction in particular subjects, including, but not limited to, world languages. The commission may establish and implement alternative requirements for additional authorizations to the single subject credential on the basis of specialized needs. For purposes of this subdivision, a special secondary teaching credential means a special secondary teaching credential issued on the basis of at least a baccalaureate degree, a student teaching requirement, and 24 semester units of coursework in the subject specialty of the credential.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, coursework
 completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may count toward the 20 semester hours requirement.

(b) (1) “Multiple subject instruction” means the practice of assignment of teachers and students for multiple subject matter instruction, as is commonly practiced in California elementary schools and as is commonly practiced in early childhood education.

(2) The holder of a multiple subject teaching credential or a standard elementary credential who either (A) has completed 20 semester hours of coursework or 10 semester hours of upper division or graduate coursework approved by the commission at a regionally
 accredited institution of higher education in any subject commonly taught in grades 9 and below, or (B) has been verified as having subject matter competence pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 for any subject commonly taught in grades 9 and below, shall be eligible to have that subject appear on the credential as authorization to teach the subject in departmentalized classes in grades 9 and below. The governing board of a school district by resolution may authorize the holder of a multiple subject teaching credential or a standard elementary credential to teach any subject in departmentalized classes to a given class or group of pupils below grade 9, provided that the teacher has completed at least 12 semester units, or 6 upper division or graduate units, of coursework at a regionally accredited institution of higher education in each subject to be taught. The authorization shall be with the teacher’s consent. However, the commission, by regulation, may provide that evidence of
 additional competence is necessary for instruction in particular subjects, including, but not limited to, world languages. The commission may establish and implement alternative requirements for additional authorizations to the multiple subject credential on the basis of specialized needs.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, coursework completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may count toward the 20 semester hours or 12 semester units requirements.

(c) “Specialist instruction” means any specialty requiring advanced preparation or special competence, including, but not limited to, reading specialist, mathematics specialist,
 specialist in special education, or early childhood education, and such other specialties as the commission may determine.

(d) “Designated subjects” means the practice of assignment of teachers and pupils to designated technical, trade, or career technical courses which courses may be part of a program of trade, technical, or career technical education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 88, Sec. 3.   (AB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44257.

(a) The commission shall issue single subject teaching credentials only in the following subjects:

(1) Agriculture.

(2) Art.

(3) Business.

(4) Dance.

(5) English.

(6) World Language.

(7) Health Science.

(8) Home Economics.

(9) Industrial and Technology Education.

(10) Mathematics.

(11) Music.

(12) Physical Education.

(13) Science.

(14) Social Science.

(15) Theater.

(b) The commission shall issue the single subject teaching credential in world language with an authorization to teach Mandarin, Cantonese, French, German, Russian, Spanish, or any other language that the commission determines is appropriate.

(c) Subjects that are commonly taught in departmentalized classes in California public schools shall be subsumed under the credential categories in subdivision (a).

(d) The commission shall issue single subject teaching credentials in the categories that were identified in Section 44282 as of December 31, 1993, to applicants who were in the process of preparing to earn those credentials before the effective date of the commission’s implementation of subdivision (a).

(e) (1) A person issued a single subject teaching credential in English before the establishment of a single subject teaching credential in theater is authorized to teach theater. A person pursuing a single subject teaching credential in
 English before the establishment of a single subject teaching credential in theater shall not become subject to additional requirements for the single subject teaching credential in English as a result of the authorization provided by this paragraph.

(2) A person issued a single subject teaching credential in physical education before the establishment of a single subject teaching credential in dance is authorized to teach dance. A person pursuing a single subject teaching credential in physical education before the establishment of a single subject teaching credential in dance shall not become subject to additional requirements for the single subject teaching credential in physical education as a result of the authorization provided by this paragraph.

(f) This section shall not
 be construed to prohibit a school district from employing a person who holds a single subject teaching credential in another subject with an authorization to teach theater from teaching theater, or a person who holds a single subject teaching credential in another subject with an authorization to teach dance from teaching dance.

(g) (1) (A) An individual holding a single subject teaching credential in Social Science, Business, Mathematics, or Home Economics is authorized to teach the personal finance course specified in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.

(B) This paragraph does not constitute a change in,
 but is declaratory of, existing law.

(2) The commission may establish a supplementary authorization that authorizes individuals holding single subject teaching credentials not listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) to teach the personal finance course specified in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   (AB 2927)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44257.2.

(a) In order to ensure excellence in teaching in specific subjects, the commission may issue a multiple or single subject teaching credential with a specified concentration in a particular subject based upon the depth of an applicant’s preparation in an important subject of the school curriculum. The commission shall establish and maintain standards for concentrations in particular subjects, as necessary.

(b) The commission shall determine the authorizations of teaching credentials with concentrations. The commission shall ensure that with the exceptions of the single subject credentials specified in subdivision (c) of this section, the authorization of a credential with a specified concentration shall not be more
 restrictive than the authorization of the same credential without the specified concentration.

(c) The commission shall issue the single subject teaching credentials in mathematics and science with a specified concentration in a particular subject. The commission shall establish and maintain standards for concentrations in the following specific subject areas:

(1) Mathematics shall consist of concentrations in advanced mathematics and foundational mathematics. The holder of a single subject credential in mathematics shall be qualified and authorized to teach courses in numbers and quantity, algebra, geometry, probability, and statistics in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

 (2) Science shall consist of concentrations in biological sciences, chemistry, geosciences, and physics. The holder of the single
 subject teaching credential in science shall be qualified and authorized to teach courses in general science, introductory science, integrated science, and coordinated science in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 16.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

44257.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Recognition of study in linked learning” is a statement added to a single subject teaching credential that the credential holder has completed a commission-approved program in linked learning teaching methods that can be applied to the academic instruction authorized by his or her credential. A recognition of study in a linked learning teacher preparation program may be offered as part of an initial teacher preparation program or as a separate program for previously credentialed teachers.

(2) “Linked learning programs” are programs and pathways described in Section
 52372.5 and may include, but are not limited to, California partnership academies.

(b) The commission may convene a workgroup to develop program standards for the issuance of a recognition of study for linked learning competence for holders of a single subject teaching credential who will be teaching pupils enrolled in linked learning programs pursuant to Section 52372.5.

(c) Members of the workgroup shall include, but are not limited to, representatives from:

(1) The department.

(2) Approved teacher preparation programs, including at least one representative from the California State University, the University of California, and independent institutions of higher education. To the extent practicable, representatives should have an academic interest or
 prior experience in preparing teachers to teach in linked learning programs.

(3) The business community, including representatives from local chambers of commerce.

(4) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools that have implemented linked learning programs, California partnership academies, or other similar programs that integrate core academic subject and industry applications.

(5) Regional occupational centers and programs.

(6) Practicing career technical education teachers.

(7) Other organizations deemed appropriate by the commission.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that a successful
 candidate for a recognition of study developed in linked learning pursuant to subdivision (b) demonstrate appropriate knowledge, as determined by the commission based upon the recommendations of the workgroup convened pursuant to subdivision (b). Within the context of the academic content standards in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, this knowledge may include, but is not limited to, an understanding of the following:

(1) How to develop and maintain industry and postsecondary educational partnerships.

(2) Ongoing professional learning.

(3) Work-based learning strategies.

(4) Career exposure and development.

(5) Interdisciplinary collaboration and project-based teaching
 methods.

(6) California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards adopted by the state board.

(e) With respect to any recognition of study in linked learning issued pursuant to subdivision (b), the California State University and other teacher preparation institutions are encouraged to establish goals for increasing the number of teachers prepared through linked learning programs.

(f) Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment programs are encouraged to provide appropriate support, mentoring, and assistance to beginning teachers who are teaching in linked learning programs, including candidates who are in externships.

(g) The commission may work with the Superintendent to gather and post, on an appropriate Internet Web site, best practices
 from school districts and schools on curriculum development and professional development relating to implementing and sustaining multiple pathway programs.

(h) The holder of a single subject teaching credential receiving a recognition of study in linked learning pursuant to subdivision (b) is not authorized to teach subject matter content or English learners unless he or she holds an appropriate authorization or is employed on the basis of a local assignment option.

(i) Any recognition of study in linked learning issued pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be considered a type of authorization, shall not be used as a condition of employment, shall not replace a subject matter competence requirement, and shall not be used in making employment decisions pursuant to Section 44955.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.   (AB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

44257.4.

The commission shall periodically review and assess the adequacy and relevance of the subjects of teaching credentials set forth in Section 44257, and shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 809, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44257.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2024, the commission shall convene a workgroup on credentialing for instruction in computer science to do all of the following:

(1) Determine which single subject teaching credentials or designated subjects career technical education teaching credentials, if any, should also authorize teaching computer science.

(2) Determine whether a single subject teaching credential in computer science should be established.

(3) Make recommendations on strategies to meet the workforce demands associated with expanding access to computer science instruction to all pupils.

(b) At least one-half of the workgroup shall be composed of current classroom teachers with experience teaching computer science at the secondary level and the workgroup shall also include representatives from:

(1) School administration.

(2) Institutions of higher education involved in the preparation of teachers to teach computer science.

(3) Content experts in the field of computer science education.

(c) On or before July 1, 2025, the commission shall provide a report of the workgroup’s findings and recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(d) This section shall remain
 in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(e) The implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 834, Sec. 1.   (AB 1251)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.

A teacher who is authorized for single subject instruction may be assigned, with his consent, to teach any subject in his authorized fields at any grade level; preschool; kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive; or in classes organized primarily for adults, and similarly, a teacher authorized for multiple subject instruction may be assigned, with his consent, to teach in any self-contained classroom; preschool; kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive; or in classes organized primarily for adults; and similarly, a teacher authorized as a specialist teacher may be assigned, with his consent, to teach in his area of specialization at any grade level; preschool; kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive; or in classes organized primarily for adults.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.1.

The holder of a credential authorizing instruction in a self-contained classroom may teach in any of grades 5 to 8, inclusive, in a middle school, provided that he or she teaches two or more subjects for two or more periods per day to the same group of pupils, and, in addition, may teach any of the subjects he or she already is teaching to a separate group of pupils at the same grade level as those pupils he or she already is teaching for an additional period or periods, provided that the additional period or periods do not exceed one-half of the teacher’s total assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1064, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.15.

Notwithstanding Section 44258.1, the holder of a credential authorizing instruction in a self-contained classroom may provide instruction in a team teaching setting or may regroup pupils across classrooms in subjects authorized by the governing board of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.2.

The holder of a single subject teaching credential or a standard secondary teaching credential may, with the credentialholder’s consent, be assigned by action of the governing board to teach classes in grades 5 to 8, inclusive, in a middle school, if the credentialholder has a minimum of 12 semester units, or six upper division or graduate units, of coursework at a regionally accredited institution of higher education in the subject to which the credentialholder is assigned. For purposes of this section, coursework completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may
 count toward the 12 semester units requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 10.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.3.

(a) The governing board of a school district may assign the holder of a credential, other than an emergency permit, to teach any subjects in departmentalized classes in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, if the governing board verifies, before making the assignment, that the teacher has adequate knowledge of each subject to be taught and the teacher consents to that assignment. The governing board shall adopt policies and procedures for the purpose of verifying the adequacy of subject knowledge on the part of each of those teachers. The governing board shall involve subject matter specialists in the subjects commonly taught in the school district in the development and implementation of
 the policies and procedures, and shall include in those policies and procedures both of the following:

(1) One or more of the following ways to assess subject matter competence:

(A) Observation by subject matter specialists, as defined in subdivision (d).

(B) Oral interviews.

(C) Demonstration lessons.

(D) Presentation of curricular portfolios.

(E) Written examinations.

(2) Specific criteria and standards for verifying adequacy of subject matter knowledge using any of
 the methods in paragraph
 (1). The criteria shall include, but need not be limited to, evidence of the candidate’s knowledge of the subject matter to be taught, including demonstrated knowledge of the curriculum framework for the subject to be taught and the specific content of the course of study in the school district for the subject, at the grade level to be taught.

(b) Teaching assignments made pursuant to this section shall be valid only in that school district. The principal of the school, or other appropriate administrator, shall notify the exclusive representative of the certificated employees for that school district, as provided under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, of each instance in which a teacher is assigned to teach classes pursuant to this section. The commission may
 suspend the authority of a school district to use the teaching assignment option authorized by this section upon a finding that the school district has violated this section.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the effect of Section 44955 with regard to the reduction by a school district governing board of the number of certificated employees.

(d) For purposes of this section, “subject matter specialists” are mentor teachers, curriculum specialists, resource teachers, classroom teachers certified to teach a subject, staff to regional subject matter projects or curriculum institutes, or college faculty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.7.

(a) The holder of a standard secondary credential who, before September 1, 1989, has taught successfully in a subject within the department of the credentialholder’s academic major or minor for a minimum of three years, as verified by the employing school district, may receive a supplementary authorization in that subject upon application, payment of a fee, which shall not exceed one-half of the regular credential fee, and evidence that one of the following has been accomplished:

(1) (A) Successful completion, by September 1, 1989, of a minimum of 12 semester units, or six upper division or graduate units, of coursework at a regionally accredited institution of higher education in the subject.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, coursework completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may count toward the 12 semester units requirement.

(2) The securing of a passing score on an examination in the subject approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(3) Verification of competence in the subject matter by a subject area specialist not associated with the employing school district.

(b) A person who holds a teaching credential in a subject or subjects other than physical education may be authorized
 by action of the local governing board to coach one period per day in a competitive sport for which pupils receive physical education credit, provided that the credentialholder is a full-time employee of the school district and has completed a minimum of 20 hours of first aid instruction appropriate for the specific sport.

(c) A teacher employed on a full-time basis who teaches kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and who has special skills and preparation outside of the teacher’s credential authorization may, with the teacher’s consent, be assigned to teach an elective course in the area of the special skills or preparation, provided that the assignment is first approved by a committee on assignments. For purposes of this subdivision an “elective course” is a course other than English, mathematics, science, or social studies. The membership of the committee on assignments shall include an equal number of teachers, selected by
 teachers, and school administrators, selected by school administrators.

(d) Assignments approved by the committee on assignments shall be for a maximum of one school year, but may be extended by action of the committee upon application by the schoolsite administrator and the affected teacher. All initial assignments or extensions shall be approved before the assignment or extension. Districts making assignments under this subdivision shall submit a plan to the county superintendent of schools that shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Statements signed by the district superintendent and the president or chairperson of the district governing board, approving the establishment of the committee.

(2) Procedures for selection of the committee membership.

(3) Terms of office for committee members.

(4) Criteria for determining teachers’ qualifications for these assignments.

(e) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing may develop and recommend general criteria that may be used by local committees on assignment in assessing a candidate’s qualifications.

(f) The commission shall issue an Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate to candidates serving in a position pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 49024 upon verification of the candidate’s personal identification and verification that the candidate meets all professional requirements pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, 44341, and 44346.5. Each certificate shall be issued initially for a five-year period and may be renewed. The commission shall establish a fee
 for the Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 11.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44258.9.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(A) That continued monitoring of educator assignments by the commission and the county superintendents of schools and continued reporting of educator assignments by the department will help ensure that local educational agencies meet state and federal reporting requirements, including the requirements of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95), or any other federal law that effectively replaces that act, and will ensure that the rate of educator misassignments remains low.

(B) That local educational agencies, state officials, pupils, and guardians have a vested interest in knowing and
 understanding the capacity of local educational agencies to fill all available and funded teaching assignments with educators who are fully credentialed for the subjects and pupils they are teaching, and a vested interest in understanding the scope of the teacher shortage across the TK/K–12 educational system, including, but not limited to, those instances where vacancies cannot be filled, resulting in the use of substitutes, increases in class size, or cancellation of courses or classes.

(2) To support pupil access to credentialed and appropriately assigned educators, the commission and the department shall collaborate to publish annual data on educator credentialing and assignment, at the school, local educational agency, and state levels. To the extent possible, and with the funds provided for that purpose, each county office of education shall perform its duties as a monitoring authority, as specified in subdivision (e).

(3) The commission and the department shall collaborate to perform the duties specified in this section, with the commission executing the assignment monitoring process and the department facilitating the annual teaching assignment monitoring data production and publication.

(4) The teaching assignment monitoring outcome data reporting shall be executed in a manner consistent with the statewide system of support and the school accountability system established pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4, county office of education monitoring established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1240) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1, and the state plan approved by the state board that is required for compliance with the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, or any other federal law that effectively replaces that
 act.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions and identifications apply:

(1) (A) “An instance of a teacher shortage” means an identification by the commission that a course or class assignment is not any of the following:

(i) Permanently filled as of Census Day.

(ii) Filled by a fully credentialed teacher.

(iii) Filled by a teacher who is appropriately assigned.

(B) A “fully credentialed teacher” means an individual who has completed a teacher preparation program, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 44225.7, and who holds a valid preliminary or clear credential issued based upon
 the completion of that teacher preparation program.

(C) An assignment is “permanently filled as of Census Day” if the educator serving as a teacher has been contracted as of Census Day to provide instruction for either the entire school year or for a one-semester course for the entire semester.

(D) A teacher is “appropriately assigned” if the teacher holds a credential, permit, or waiver issued by the commission that contains an authorization to legally teach in the setting, in the subject area, and the pupil population associated with the assignment.

(2) “An unfilled position” shall be identified in each instance where a local educational agency has attempted to fill or is actively trying to fill an open and funded position, but is unable to do so.

(3) “A vacant position” shall be identified in each instance where, as of Census Day, a course or class assignment has not been permanently filled by a single-designated certificated employee serving for either the entire school year or for a one-semester course for the entire semester. For purposes of identifying an instance of a teacher shortage pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (i), a “vacant position” shall be limited to an employee serving as a teacher.

(4) “Assignment” means the placement of an individual in a teaching or services position. An “assignment” can be filled legally by an individual with a credential, permit, waiver, or any other document issued by the commission authorizing the assignment, or the individual may be otherwise authorized by statute.

(5) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter
 school, or state special school.

(6) “Misassignment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 33126. For purposes of this section, “employee,” as used in the definition of “misassignment” in Section 33126, includes an individual hired on a contract. For purposes of this section, in a charter school, “misassignment” shall apply only to employees in teaching positions.

(7) “Monitoring authority” means:

(A) The county office of education for school districts in the county and programs operated by the county office of education.

(B) The commission for a school district or county office of education that operates within a city or county in which there is a single school district, including the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Del Norte, Mariposa, Plumas, and
 Sierra, and the City and County of San Francisco, and the state special schools.

(C) (i) The chartering authority for a charter school.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), in cases where a charter school operates under the authority of a school district in which the charter school is the sole schoolsite in the school district, the commission shall serve as the monitoring authority.

(8) “System,” unless the context requires otherwise, means the California Statewide Assignment Accountability System, which is an electronic data system administered by the commission for monitoring educator assignments and vacant positions and uses department data collected pursuant to Sections 10600 and 60900 for its functioning.

(c) The commission and
 the department shall enter into a data sharing agreement for the department to provide the commission with educator assignment data necessary to annually identify educator assignments, including assignments filled by individuals on preliminary or clear credentials, intern credentials, permits or waivers, misassignments, and vacant positions at local educational agencies. The data sharing agreement shall also require the commission to make credential, permit, waiver, misassignment, vacant positions, and other relevant data available to the department to support reporting consistent with the state plan approved by the state board that is required for compliance with the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114–95), or any other federal law that effectively replaces that act, and applicable state reporting requirements, including for the statewide system of support established pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4.

(d) The commission and the department may engage in a variety of activities designed to inform school administrators, teachers, and personnel within the county offices of education of the regulations and statutes affecting the assignment of educators and how data on educator assignments is published and used. These activities may include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, the preparation of instructive brochures and the holding of regional workshops.

(e) (1) The commission shall annually use the data provided by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) to produce an initial data file of vacant positions and educator assignments that do not have a clear match of credential to assignment. The commission shall notify local educational agencies and monitoring authorities of the opportunity to access the system and review the initial data file of potential
 misassignments and vacant positions.

(2) A local educational agency may do any of the following within 60 days of the commission’s notification pursuant to paragraph (1):

(A) Access and review the initial data file in the system to determine if each educator included in the initial data file is otherwise legally authorized for the assignment.

(B) Submit documentation or additional assignment information to the commission and monitoring authority showing that the educator is otherwise legally authorized for the assignment. This information may include the use of local assignment options outlined in any statute or regulation.

(C) Submit documentation to the commission and monitoring authority showing that a position identified in the initial data file as
 vacant was miscoded and that a legally authorized educator was assigned to the position.

(3) Information submitted to the commission and monitoring authority pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be submitted electronically through the system.
